Illinois, session 104th, SB1101.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Cigarette Tax Act is amended by changing 5Section 30 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 130/30)  (from Ch. 120, par. 453.30)7    Sec. 30. This Act shall be known as the the "Cigarette Tax 8Act," and may be referred to by that designation.9(Source: Laws 1945, p. 1220.)